Washington statutes.
RCW 43.114.005

Legislative declaration.

The legislature declares that the public policy of this state is to ensure equal opportunity for all Washingtonians. The legislature believes that the state is responsible for improving its interface with the LGBTQ community, identifying the needs of its members, and ensuring that there is an effective means of advocating for LGBTQ equity in all aspects of state government. Therefore, the legislature deems it necessary to create a commission to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

[ 2019 c 395 s 1.]